Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support
“(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 21-13-309(p), as amended by section 1 of this act, using computations of district foundation program amounts by the department of education based upon reports from districts required by the department, the foundation program amount computed for a district under W.S. 21-13-309(p) for school year 2006-2007 and each school year thereafter through the next recalibration of the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(t), less amounts reimbursed under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E), shall not be less than one hundred percent (100%) of the foundation program amount available to that district during the 2005-2006 school year, as computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) prior to the addition of the reimbursement amounts under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E) for that school year. A district is not entitled to additional funding under this section if, but for a decrease in ADM as compared with the 2005-2006 school year, that district would not have a foundation program amount that is less than one hundred percent (100%) of the school year 2005-2006 foundation program amount.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, this section shall not apply to any district subject to recapture under W.S. 21-13-102(b) whose recapture revenues exceed limitations imposed under W.S. 21-13-102(c), as established by the department for that district.”

Laws 2006, ch. 37, Section 7, provides: “[EDUCATION STUDIES]

“(a) For purposes of carrying out the requirements of W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv)(C), as amended under section 1 of this act, the state superintendent of public instruction shall in consultation with the Wyoming school facilities commission, develop statewide guidelines on the configuration of schools for computations under the education resource block grant model and determination of school foundation program amounts under law, for recommendation to the joint education interim committee. Guidelines developed under this subsection shall address school configuration on the basis of the adequate delivery of the required statewide educational program in a cost-efficient and educationally effective manner. The purpose of this subsection is to address the appropriate school configuration for application to the education resource block grant model and not the authority of districts to configure school grade levels. On or before November 1, 2008, recommendations shall be reported to the joint education interim committee together with an analysis of the impact of recommendations on existing school configurations established by school districts.

“(b) The Wyoming school facilities commission shall report to the joint education interim committee and the select school facilities committee on modifications to the statewide adequacy standards for school buildings and facilities established under W.S.

21-15-115

, as necessary to accommodate full day kindergarten programs in Wyoming schools. The report shall be made on or before August 1, 2006.

“(c) For purposes of refining components within the education resource block grant model resourcing education programs supporting at-risk students, the department of education shall:

“(i) Develop a standard, accurate procedure for the identification of mobile students as used within the model to resource at-risk programs;

“(ii) Through reporting requirements imposed upon school districts by rule and regulation of the department, compile district information on at-risk program effectiveness as measured by student program entrance and exit performance indicators and by district at-risk program structure, content and delivery information.

“(d) The department of education shall annually report progress on activities conducted under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section to the joint education interim committee by December 1, with findings and recommendations reported to the committee on necessary remedial legislative action, if any, on or before November 1, 2008. Recommendations under paragraph (c)(i) of this section shall be submitted to the committee on or before December 1, 2006.

“(e) The department of education shall conduct a detailed analysis of district revenues and expenditures for food service programs, clearly identifying and describing the basis for program deficits experienced by school districts. Findings from this analysis shall be reported to the joint education interim committee on or before December 1, 2006, together with recommendations addressing program revenue shortfalls.

“(f) In addition to subsection (e) of this section, the department of education shall review district expenditures for student activity programs. The department may impose additional data reporting requirements upon districts as necessary to undertake this review and shall identify factors resulting in variations in district expenditures. Findings under this subsection shall be reported to the joint education interim committee on or before December 1, 2006.

“(g) The department of education shall review school district safety and security needs including a review of safety and security issues facing public schools, proposed statewide guidelines and standards addressing district safety and security of schools, a review of revenues available to districts for addressing safety and security needs and recommendations for state assistance to districts necessary to address safety and security issues. The department shall consult with the Wyoming school facilities commission in undertaking the review required under this subsection. Study findings and recommendations shall be reported to the joint education interim committee on or before December 1, 2006.

“(h) On or before December 1, 2006, the department shall also report to the joint education interim committee and to the joint appropriations interim committee on the following based upon school year 2005-2006 actual data and to the extent possible, upon school year 2006-2007 actual and estimated data:

“(i) The methodology used to distribute federal special education funds and the amount distributed to each school district and to each developmental pre-school;

“(ii) The amount of state funds reimbursed to school districts under the Wyoming education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(II) and

21-13-321

, as amended under section 1 of this act;

“(iii) The amount of unexpended federal special education funds for each school district;

“(iv) The length of time school districts may keep federal special education funds and a description of the process by which these funds revert to the state and federal government;

“(v) If federal special education funds supplant or supplement state funds distributed through the Wyoming education resource block grant model or other providers through either the department of education or the department of health;

“(vi) The extent to which future federal funds may offset state special education expenditures.

“(j) Three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00) is appropriated from the school foundation program account to the department of education as necessary to implement subsections (a) and (c) through (h) of this section and to administer this act. On or before July 1, 2007, the department shall report to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on the expenditure of funds appropriated under this section.”

21-13-309(m)(vi) , amended by Ch. 105, § 3, 2016 Wyoming Session Laws inadvertently contained additional language to the existing law.
The provision has been published as reconciled by the LSO.

21-13-309(m)(vi) , amended by Ch. 105, § 3, 2016 Wyoming Session Laws inadvertently contained additional language to the existing law.
The provision has been published as reconciled by the LSO.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2001, ch. 190 § 2, provides that the purpose of the act is to make an adjustment to the dollar amount per average daily membership for each school level so that the teacher seniority adjustment is fully implemented.

Higher Education Act. —

The federal Higher Education Act of 1965, referred to in this section, appeared as 20 U.S.C. § 1099a-1 before being omitted by P.L. 105-244.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 301, directs the division of economic analysis, department of administration and information, to report to the joint education interim committee on final recommendations for an instrument to measure regional cost differences in Wyoming based upon study of findings contained within the November 2002 report on the regional cost adjustment to the education resource block grant model, conducted in accordance with Laws 2002, ch. 76, § 13, a copy of which is on file with the legislative service office. Recommendations are to define a rigorous statistical adjustment that considers and accounts for salary demands in all regions of the state and should minimize incentives for discretionary actions by school districts to impact adjustment estimations. The report is to be submitted to the joint education interim committee on or before October 1, 2003. Following receipt of this report, the joint education interim committee is to submit recommendations and enabling legislation to the legislature which implement a regional cost adjustment to the education resource block grant model for school year 2004-2005 and each school year thereafter. Recommendations are to be submitted insufficient time for consideration the 2004 budget session.

Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 1301(b), makes § 301, effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2003.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 333, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4. appropriates $400,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education to assist school districts with the recruitment of teachers in special education, math, science, and multiple or unique endorsement requirements of Wyoming schools. Any compensation adjustment paid under this section is not to be included in the special education adjustment to the education resource block grant model under §

21-13-321

for corresponding compensation adjustments paid during school year 2005-2006. Any unencumbered, unexpended and unobligated amounts appropriated under this section revert on June 30, 2006 to the school foundation program education account.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 335, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates from the school foundation program account to the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education Certifying Office at the University of Wyoming $600,000 of federal mineral royalty income received under the provisions of § 9-4-601(d)(iii) for the National American Indian, Alaskan and Hawaiian Educational Development Center to improve the education of Native American children but only if federal matching funds are received.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 342, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates $22,736,000 from the school foundation program account to school districts for school year 2005-2006 to provide bonus payments to district professional, certified and classified staff to assist districts with the retention and recruitment of employees. The intent of the additional payment is to enhance district employee retention and recruiting capabilities and not to expand the number of district employees. Any amount distributed under this section is not intended to reflect or be incorporated into any cost-based component of or adjustment to the educational resource block grant model under §

21-13-309

and is not to impose any condition upon requirement for model reevaluation under §

21-13-309

(t), nor is it to be included in the transportation and special education adjustments to the education resource block grant model under §§

21-13-320

and

21-13-321

for school year 2005-2006. On or before October 15, 2005, each district receiving a payment under this section is to report actual or budgeted payment expenditures to the department of education, reporting in detail the amount awarded the each employee and the purpose of the award. The reports are to be compiled by the department and submitted to members of the management council, joint education interim committee and joint appropriations interim committee.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act”.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act”.

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Inflation adjustment. —

Subsection (o)(ii) is unconstitutional; statewide average salaries must be adjusted for the full cost-of-living differences using either the entire Wyoming cost-of-living index or another reasonable formula which includes a full housing component, including the rental of shelter costs, and a medical component to cover costs not included in the benefits portion of the salary component. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

The statute must be adjusted for inflation no later than July 1, 2002, and each biennium thereafter so long as a cost of education model using historic costs is relied upon for the basis of education funding. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Recalibration. —

With regard to administrative and classified salaries for educational personnel, the consultant evaluated the salaries and adjusted them for responsibility measured by the number of students, education, including advanced degrees, and experience; those adjustments demonstrated compliance with the recalibration requirements in this section.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

If the state chooses to use the Wyoming cost of living index to adjust the statewide average salaries to address situations where the cost of living exceeds the statewide average, there is not now and never has been a constitutional requirement that those salaries in lower than average cost areas must be reduced below what the model assumes is the actual cost; so long as the state relies upon a cost of education model, regional cost of living adjustments cannot reduce salaries below those which the state's model establishes as the statewide cost of hiring educational personnel.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

Legislature required that the education block grant model be recalibrated not less than once every five years, and that between recalibrations the amount computed for each school district should be adjusted to provide for the effects of inflation; although there were complaints about leaving the decision regarding inflation adjustments in the hands of the legislature each year, the expenditure of state funds was the legislature's responsibility, and whether it adopted a particular index, which it could change at any time it chose, or whether it made a judgment biannually in the budgetary process, did not control the determination of whether school funding was constitutional, and not based on wealth-based disparities.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

Based on the salary and benefits recalibrations in 2001 and 2006, the legislature was committed to assuring teacher salaries and benefits in Wyoming remained adequate to deliver a constitutionally sound public education system.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

Kindergarten. —

The legislature was required to make a one-time apportioned supplement to fully fund each school district's 1998-99 kindergarten component cost, in light of the amendment of the statute to correct a previous error pursuant to which kindergarteners were counted at a full, rather than half, average daily membership. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Scope of foundation program. —

The foundation program is intended to take into account not only a basic education but also to consider exceptional and handicapped children, vocational training, kindergarten, the problems of a one-teacher rural school, bus transportation, tuition paid by one district to another, other variables and supplemental aid for those districts with less than the minimum assessed valuation per classroom unit. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Cited

in

Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995); Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of, and sufficiency of compliance with, state standards for approval of private school to receive public placements of students or reimbursement for their educational costs, 48 ALR4th 1231.